District of Columbia statutes.
16-518

Preservation of property; sale; receiver.

The court may make all orders necessary for the preservation of the property attached during the pendency of the action. When the property is perishable, or for other reasons a sale of it appears expedient, the court may order that the property be sold and its proceeds paid into court and held subject to its order on the final decision of the case.

When it seems expedient, the court may appoint a receiver to take possession of the property. The receiver shall give bond for the due performance of his duties, and, under the direction of the court, shall have the same powers and perform the same duties as a receiver appointed according to the practice in civil actions.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-518.
1973 Ed., § 16-518.